North Carolina, session 2025, SB592.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education (Division), the
sum of twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for each year of the
2025-2027 fiscal biennium to be used for grants to counties and private employers that provide
assistance with capacity building in child care in this State, including, but not limited to, (i)
building construction, renovation, upfitting, or improvements, (ii) expansion costs, (iii) furniture
and equipment, or (iv) playground installation. The Division shall award grants under this section
pursuant to criteria established by the Division in accordance with federal law and guidance.
These grants shall be one-time awards to assist with child care initiatives as established by the
Division. Counties or private employers seeking to receive funds under this section shall provide
documentation of a twenty-five percent (25%) match as a condition of receiving these State
funds. A county or private employer receiving grant funds under this act may use up to nine
percent (9%) of the State funds awarded for administrative costs.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S592-v-1*